Washington statutes.
RCW 10.37.150

Presumptions of law need not be stated.

Neither presumptions of law nor matters of which judicial notice is taken need be stated in an indictment or information.

[ 1891 c 28 s 31; Code 1881 s 1016; 1873 p 227 s 199; 1869 p 242 s 194; RRS s 2067.]